Utah statutes.
73-20-9.   Emergency Water Resources Account -- Appropriation -- Purpose.
There is hereby appropriated to the Emergency Water Resources Account from the
General Fund, from otherwise unappropriated liquor control profits, the sum of
$2,000,000 to be expended exclusively for the construction or improvement of
water resources for eligible farmers or ranchers.
